Nevada, session 83, AB68.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 118A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, a landlord of
a dwelling unit shall make a written offer to each tenant to report
the positive rental payment information of the tenant to at least
one:
(a) Consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains
files on consumers on a nationwide basis; or
(b) Consumer reporting agency that resells or otherwise
furnishes rental payment information to a consumer reporting
agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a
nationwide basis.
2. The written offer required pursuant to subsection 1 must
include:
(a) A statement that the reporting of the positive rental
payment information of the tenant is optional;
(b) The name of each consumer reporting agency to which
positive rental payment information will be reported;
(c) The amount of any fee charged pursuant to subsection 6;
(d) Instructions on how to submit an acceptance of the written
offer to the landlord by mail;
(e) A statement that the tenant may opt in to the reporting of
the positive rental payment information of the tenant at any time
following receipt of the written offer from the landlord;
(f) A statement that the tenant may elect to stop the reporting
of the positive rental payment information of the tenant at any
time, but that the tenant will not be able to resume the reporting
for at least 6 months after such an election is made;
(g) Instructions on how to stop the reporting of the positive
rental payment information; and
(h) A signature block that the tenant must date and sign in
order to accept the written offer.
3. The landlord shall make the written offer required
pursuant to subsection 1 at the time of the lease agreement and at
least annually thereafter.
4. When the landlord makes the written offer required
pursuant to subsection 1, the landlord shall provide the tenant
with a self-addressed, stamped envelope to return the acceptance
of the written offer to the landlord.
5. A tenant may accept a written offer to report the positive
rental payment information of the tenant at any time after the
-
*AB68*

– 3 –
tenant receives the written offer. Upon request by a tenant, at any
time, the landlord shall provide the tenant additional copies of the
written offer.
6. If a tenant accepts the written offer to report the positive
rental payment information of the tenant, the landlord may
require the tenant to pay a fee in an amount not to exceed the
actual cost to the landlord to report the positive rental payment
information or $10 per month, whichever is less. If the landlord
does not incur any actual cost to report the positive rental payment
information, the landlord shall not charge the tenant any fee for
the reporting.
7. If a tenant fails to pay a fee charged pursuant to
subsection 6:
(a) The failure to pay the fee shall not be cause for termination
of the tenancy;
(b) The landlord shall not deduct the unpaid fee from the
security deposit of the tenant or any surety bond purchased by the
tenant in lieu of paying all or part of the security deposit;
(c) The failure to pay the fee shall not be reported to a
consumer reporting agency; and
(d) If the fee remains unpaid for 30 days or more, the landlord
may stop reporting the positive rental payment information of the
tenant and the tenant may not elect to resume the reporting for 6
months from the date on which the fee first became due.
8. A tenant who accepts the written offer to report the positive
rental payment information of the tenant may subsequently file a
written request with the landlord to stop the reporting. The
landlord shall comply with this request. The tenant may not elect
to resume the reporting for at least 6 months from the date of the
tenant’s written request to stop the reporting.
9. The provisions of this section do not apply to a landlord of
a premises that includes 15 or fewer dwelling units for occupancy
under a rental agreement unless:
(a) The landlord is the owner of more than one premises that
includes at least one dwelling unit for occupancy under a rental
agreement, regardless of the number of dwelling units at each
premises; and
(b) The landlord is:
(1) A real estate investment trust, as defined in 26 U.S.C.
§ 856;
(2) A corporation; or
(3) A limited liability company in which at least one
member is a corporation.
10. For purposes of this section:
-
*AB68*

– 4 –
(a) “Consumer reporting agency” has the meaning ascribed to
it in 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(f).
(b) “Consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains
files on consumers on a nationwide basis” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(p).
Sec. 2. On or before October 1, 2025, a landlord shall provide
the written offer required pursuant to subsection 1 of section 1 of
this act to each tenant who is a party to a rental agreement entered
into before July 1, 2025.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB68*